src/capitalization.xfscript
read regex [
    A -> a, 
    B -> b, 
    C -> c, 
    D -> d, 
    E -> e, 
    F -> f, 
    G -> g, 
    H -> h, 
    I -> i, 
    J -> j, 
    K -> k, 
    L -> l, 
    M -> m,
    N -> n,
    O -> o,
    P -> p,
    Q -> q,
    R -> r,
    S -> s,
    T -> t,
    U -> u,
    V -> v,
    W -> w,
    X -> x,
    Y -> y,
    Z -> z] ;
